Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF2247.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 97B.645, subdivision 9, is amended to read: Subd. 9. Open season. deleted text begin There shall be nodeleted text end new text begin (a) The commissioner must prescribe an annualnew text end open season for wolves deleted text begin until afterdeleted text end new text begin unlessnew text end the wolf is deleted text begin delisteddeleted text end new text begin currently listednew text end under the federal Endangered Species Act of 1973. deleted text begin After that time, the commissioner may prescribe open seasons and restrictions for taking wolves but must provide opportunity for public comment.deleted text end new text begin The season, restrictions, and any other requirements must be consistent with the goals identified in the wolf management plan adopted under section 97B.646.new text end new text begin (b) The commissioner must annually consult with the commissioner of agriculture and the United States Department of Agriculture, Animal and Plant Health Inspection Service, before determining the season, restrictions, and other requirements of the open season required under this section. The consultation must include a review of available data on wolf depredation on livestock and pets and other incidents of human conflict. new text end Sec. 2. new text begin NORTHEAST DEER MANAGEMENT TASK FORCE.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Establishment. new text end new text begin By October 1, 2025, the commissioner of natural resources must establish a Northeast Deer Management Task Force to make recommendations to the commissioner and the legislature for policy and law changes to increase deer populations in the northeastern part of the state. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Membership. new text end new text begin Members of the task force must primarily reside or operate in northeast Minnesota and must include hunters, wildlife managers, Tribal members, a representative of the Minnesota Deer Hunters Association, and other interested parties as determined by the commissioner. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Duties; report. new text end new text begin The commissioner must work in collaboration with the task force to develop effective and timely policies to increase deer populations in the northeastern part of the state. The commissioner must meet at least three times per year with the task force. The task force may at any time make recommendations to the commissioner and the legislature for policy and law changes designed to increase deer populations in the northeastern part of the state and must submit a final report to the commissioner and to the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees with jurisdiction over environment and natural resources no later than August 1, 2027. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Administration. new text end new text begin The task force expires upon submission of the final report or on August 1, 2027, whichever is earlier. The terms, compensation, and removal of members are as provided in Minnesota Statutes, section 15.059. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end